Louisiana, session 2026, HB676.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:70.5.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§70.5.1. Fraudulent patient referrals; "body brokering"
A. No person shall knowingly or intentionally do either of the following:
(1) Solicit, offer, pay, or receive any fee, payment, rebate, commission, or
anything of value from a person for the referral of a patient to a residential substance
abuse facility, mental health facility, or a facility licensed for substance use disorder
treatment or services.
(2) Urge or market to any person to make, furnish, or receive any fee,
payment, rebate, commission, or anything of value for the referral of a patient to a
residential substance abuse facility, mental health facility, or a facility licensed for
substance use disorder treatment or services.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 676 ENROLLED
B. The provisions of this Section do not apply to a person who, pursuant to
a lawful agreement, makes, receives, or otherwise furnishes any fee, payment,
commission, or rebate that does not vary based on any of the following:
(1) The number of patients referred to a residential substance abuse facility,
mental health facility, or a facility licensed for substance use disorder treatment or
services.
(2) The duration, level, volume, or nature of the substance use disorder
treatment services provided to a patient.
(3) The amount of benefits for treatment or services provided to a patient that
are provided by a carrier to a residential substance use disorder treatment facility,
mental health facility, or a facility licensed for substance use disorder treatment or
services.
C. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Person" means a natural or juridical person, including but not limited
to a health care provider, health care facility, non-profit organization, clinical
laboratory, recovery residence, or any other individual or entity.
(2) "Residential substance abuse facility" means any licensed behavioral
health service provider with a residential substance use disorder treatment facility
module.
D. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be imprisoned with
or without hard labor for not more than five years, fined not more than fifty thousand
dollars, or both.
E. In addition to the penalties provided in Subsection D of this Section, a
person convicted under this Section shall be ordered to make full restitution to the
victim and any other person who has suffered a financial loss as a result of the
offense in accordance with Code of Criminal Procedure Article 883.2.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 676 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.